Illinois, session 104th, HB5548.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Developmental Disability and Mental 5Disability Services Act is amended by changing Section 0.01 as 6follows: 7    (405 ILCS 80/0.01)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1800-1)8    Sec. 0.01. This Act may be cited as the the Developmental 9Disability and Mental Disability Services Act.10(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)